Vermont, session 2025-2026, H463.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Technical Corrections * * *
* * * Title 3 * * *
Sec. 1. 3 V.S.A. § 2(3) is amended to read:
(3) All agencies which involve or concern interstate relationships
including:
* * *
(D) Lake Champlain Bridge Commission [Repealed.]
(E) Tri-State Regional Medical Needs Board [Repealed.]
* * *
Sec. 2. 3 V.S.A. § 11 is amended to read:
§ 11. METHOD OF DELEGATING; RESPONSIBILITY OF GOVERNOR
The delegating of duties herein authorized in this section shall be in writing
and shall specify with particularity the cases in which it is to apply. It shall
become effective only when an executed duplicate copy of the delegation is
filed in the Office of the Secretary of State. Such delegation may be revoked
at any time by the Governor, and such revocation shall be in writing and
likewise filed as the original delegation. The delegation of a particular
function shall not prevent the Governor from acting in a case thereunder, and
in any such instance, the delegation shall be of no effect. Nothing contained
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 2 of 97
2025
herein in this section shall relieve the Governor of his or her the Governor’s
responsibility for the acts of any officer designated by him or her the Governor
under the authority of sections 10–13 of this title to perform any function.
Sec. 3. 3 V.S.A. § 12 is amended to read:
§ 12. SCOPE
Sections 10–13 of this title shall be interpreted as applying only in cases in
which the Governor’s duty is approval of a prior act, appointment,
employment, or decision done or made by another officer or by a board,
commission, or agency, and shall not be interpreted as applying in cases in
which the act, appointment, employment, or decision is required to be done or
made initially by the Governor but shall not include approval of rules or
regulations.
Sec. 4. 3 V.S.A. § 13 is amended to read:
§ 13. APPLICATION
Sections 10–13 of this title shall apply only to the following sections: 202,
207 and 631 of this title; 4 V.S.A. § 852; 6 V.S.A. §§ 3, 4, 982, 1141 and
2922; 10 V.S.A. §§ 53, 54 and 4149; 20 V.S.A. §§ 1484, 1874(a), 1875, 2221,
2271, and 2273; 21 V.S.A. § 1104; 22 V.S.A. § 282; 23 V.S.A. § 103; and 29
V.S.A. §§ 3 and 1104; and 32 V.S.A. §§ 3104 and 3105.
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 3 of 97
2025
Sec. 5. 3 V.S.A. § 129 is amended to read:
§ 129. POWERS OF BOARDS OR OF DIRECTOR IN ADVISOR
PROFESSIONS; DISCIPLINE PROCESS
(a) In addition to any other provisions of law, a board or the Director, in the
case of professions that have advisor appointees, may exercise the following
powers:
* * *
(11) Treat as incomplete any license application submitted with a check
subsequently returned for insufficient funds or without the personal attestation
of the applicant or an authorized officer of an applicant corporation as to the
representations therein made in the license application.
* * *
(e)(1) When a board or the Director, in the case of professions that have
advisor appointees, intends to deny an application for a license based on the
applicant’s past or current unprofessional conduct or based on an ongoing
investigation of the applicant, in Vermont or elsewhere, for unprofessional
conduct, the board or Director shall send the applicant written notice of the
decision by certified mail. The notice shall include a statement of the reasons
for the action and shall advise the applicant that the applicant may file a
petition within 30 days after the date on which the notice is mailed with the
board or the Director for review of the board’s or Director’s preliminary
decision.
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 4 of 97
2025
* * *
(B) After the hearing, the board or Director shall affirm or reverse the
preliminary denial, explaining the reasons therefor in writing.
* * *
Sec. 6. 3 V.S.A. § 159 is amended to read:
§ 159. OPINIONS; STATE MATTERS AND ACTIONS
(a) The Attorney General shall advise the elective and appointive State
officers on questions of law relating to their official duties and shall furnish a
written opinion on such matters, when so requested.
(b) He or she The Attorney General shall have general supervision of
matters and actions in favor of the State and of those instituted by or against
State officers wherein where interests of the State are involved and may settle
such matters and actions as the interests of the State require.
Sec. 7. 3 V.S.A. chapter 9 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 9. ADMINISTRATIVE DEPARTMENTS
* * *
§ 203. AUTHORITY LIMITED
The commissioner or board at the head of each department herein specified
in this chapter shall exercise only the powers and perform the duties imposed
by law on such Department department.
* * *
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 5 of 97
2025
§ 205. DUTIES OF OFFICE
Each commissioner of a department and each officer specified in this
chapter, except the members of the boards herein specified in this chapter,
shall devote his or her the commissioner’s or officer’s entire time to the duties
of his or her the office.
§ 206. REGULATIONS RULES
The commissioner or board at the head of each department herein specified
in this chapter is empowered to prescribe and to enforce rules and regulations,
subject to the approval of the Governor, for the government and administration
of such department, the conduct of its employees and the custody, use, and
preservation of the records, books, documents, and property pertaining to
thereto the administration of the department.
§ 207. ASSISTANCE AND EXPENDITURE
(a) Each department herein specified in this chapter is empowered to
employ such assistance, clerical or otherwise, as the Governor deems
necessary for its proper and efficient administration and, subject to his or her
the Governor’s approval, to fix the compensation to be paid therefor for those
employed. No department shall expend or authorize an expenditure in excess
of the amount appropriated therefor in any fiscal year.
(b) Agency secretaries and department heads are authorized to recruit, train
and accept without regard to the civil service classification laws, and rules and
regulations, and without statutory compensation, the services of temporary
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 6 of 97
2025
volunteers for, or in aid of, interpretive function, visitor services, or other
activities in and related to areas administered by the agency secretary or
department head.
* * *
(5) Volunteer services shall not be used to displace existing or vacant
State positions but will be used to satisfy unmet public service needs. To
insure ensure compliance with the intent hereof and merit system principles,
any department or agency employing temporary volunteers shall secure the
approval of the Commissioner of Human Resources.
* * *
§ 209. EFFICIENCY AND COOPERATION; TRANSFER OF
PERSONNEL; REGULATIONS RULES OF GOVERNOR
The Governor shall provide for and require a practical working system to
ensure efficiency and mutual helpfulness among the departments herein
specified in this chapter. The Governor may transfer, temporarily or
permanently, subordinates of any one of such departments to another
department as the needs of the State may seem to him or her the Governor to
require. He or she The Governor shall adopt and have power to enforce such
rules as he or she the Governor may see fit for the conduct of such departments
and alter or add to the same in his or her the Governor’s discretion.
* * *
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 7 of 97
2025
§ 213. DECLARATION OF POLICY
(a) It is the policy of the State of Vermont that the Executive Branch of the
State government created by the constitution shall be organized into the
separate offices of the elected constitutional State officers and such
administrative agencies and departments as may be created by law. All
administrative bodies in the Executive Branch shall be placed within one of the
foregoing agencies or departments to assure ensure proper executive
supervision by the Governor.
* * *
Sec. 8. 3 V.S.A. § 263 is amended to read:
§ 263. EMPLOYEES ENTERING ARMED FORCES
(a) A person in the permanent employ of the State of Vermont who is or
has been inducted or ordered into the active service of the U.S. Armed Forces
or who voluntarily enlists or was enlisted in such service in time of war or
national emergency, or who is ordered to active duty as a member of a reserve
component of the U.S. Armed Forces and thus for any of these causes leaves a
permanent position, shall be restored to such the position or to a position of
like seniority, status, and class, or the nearest approximation thereto as he or
she the person would have had if he or she the person had been continually
employed by the State, provided such person;
(1) terminates such service or active duty with the U.S. Armed Forces at
the conclusion of his or her the person’s initial period of service or tour of
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 8 of 97
2025
duty, together with involuntary extensions thereof of service or tour of duty,
and furnishes a certificate or other valid evidence of satisfactory completion of
such military service;
(2) is still qualified to perform the duties of his or her the person’s
position with the State; and
(3) makes application for reemployment within 90 days after being
relieved of such military service.
(b) If a person returning to a position in State employment under the
provisions of subsection (a) of this section is not qualified to perform the duties
of such the position by reason of disability sustained during such service but is
qualified to perform the duties of some other position in the employ of the
State which that is vacant, such the person shall be assigned to such other
another position so as to provide him or her the person with the same seniority,
status and class, or the nearest approximation thereof as he or she the person
would have had if he or she the person had been continuously employed by the
State.
(c) The words permanent employment shall not be construed as including
any position which that is elective or appointive wherein where a term of office
has expired.
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 9 of 97
2025
Sec. 9. 3 V.S.A. chapter 13 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 13. CLASSIFICATION OF STATE PERSONNEL
§ 309. DUTIES OF COMMISSIONER OF HUMAN RESOURCES
(a) The Commissioner, as administrative head of the Department, shall
direct and supervise all its administrative and technical activities. In addition
to the duties imposed elsewhere in this chapter, it shall be the Commissioner’s
duty:
(1) To apply and carry out this chapter and the rules adopted thereunder
in accordance with this chapter.
* * *
(5) To investigate from time to time the operation and effect of this
chapter and of the rules made thereunder adopted in accordance with this
chapter and to report his or her the Commissioner’s findings to the Secretary of
Administration and to the Governor.
* * *
(13) To compile and publish a manual, which shall be kept current,
containing the pertinent statutes, and rules, and regulations of the Department
of Human Resources and its rules of procedure and forms prescribed for use by
rule or regulation.
* * *
§ 310. CLASSIFICATION PLAN; RULES
* * *
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 10 of 97
2025
(e) Subject to bargaining rights as set forth in chapter 27 of this title, the
Commissioner of Human Resources shall make such regulations and adopt
such rules and methods of qualifying employees for positions as will make the
plan effective, and shall prescribe adopt rules governing appointments,
probation, promotions, demotions, transfers, separations, vacations, sick leave,
and hours of employment applicable to persons in the classified service.
(f) The Classification and Compensation Plan and the rules and regulations
for personnel administration shall be based on merit system principles and
shall provide for compliance with the laws relating to preference granted to
qualified persons who have served in the U.S. Armed Forces and received
honorable discharge.
* * *
§ 311. CLASSIFIED SERVICE DEFINED; EXCEPTIONS
(a) The classified service to which this chapter shall apply shall include all
positions and categories of employment by the State, except as otherwise
provided by law, and except the following:
* * *
(8) Persons employed in a professional or scientific capacity to make or
conduct a temporary and special inquiry, investigation, or examination on
behalf of the Legislature General Assembly or a committee thereof of the
General Assembly, or by authority of the Governor.
* * *
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 11 of 97
2025
§ 312. CLASSIFICATION PLAN; DEFINITION
* * *
(b) Merit system principles are:
* * *
(3) training employees, as needed, to assure ensure high-quality
performance;
* * *
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, rules, regulations, or
agreements whenever federal requirements are applicable to programs as a
condition for receipt of federal funds or assistance, all agency secretaries,
department heads, division heads, and other State officers, with the approval of
the Governor or of such the person as the Governor may designate, are
authorized to take such action as is necessary to assure ensure that all
personnel practices in those programs are in accordance with federal laws,
regulations, and requirements. This provision shall not be construed to
authorize the impairment of the State’s obligations under any contract or
agreement, or of the vested rights and remedies of any person.
* * *
§ 315. DUTIES OF STATE OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES
All officers and employees of the State shall comply with the provisions of
this chapter and lawful rules, regulations and orders of the Commissioner of
Human Resources pursuant thereto. The Commissioner of Human Resources,
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 12 of 97
2025
with the approval of the Governor, may institute and maintain any action or
proceeding to secure compliance with the provisions of this chapter and lawful
rules, regulations, and orders pursuant thereto.
§ 316. RECORDS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN RESOURCES
The records of the Department, except such records as the rules may
properly require to be held confidential for reasons of public policy, shall be
public records and shall be open to public inspection, subject to reasonable
regulations rules as to the time and manner of inspection as may be prescribed
by the Commissioner.
* * *
§ 330. VERMONT INTERNSHIP PROGRAM
* * *
(b) Position authorization.
* * *
(2) The positions may be created in response to real or anticipated
recruitment and retention difficulties or in instances wherein where the
Commissioner has determined the State’s needs for individuals to serve in a
certain position will best be met through the Vermont internship program.
* * *
(5) Requests for positions under the Vermont Internship Program shall
be in a form and following procedures prescribed by the Commissioner. All
requests shall certify that all reasonable efforts shall be made to insure ensure a
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 13 of 97
2025
vacant position will be available to each Vermont Internship Program
participant upon completion of the program.
(c) Eligibility.
(1) Eligibility. Any person shall be eligible to compete for participation
in the Vermont Internship Program.
(2) Outreach efforts shall be extended appropriately to assure ensure that
all segments of the qualified populace are informed about opportunities to
apply and compete for these vacancies on the basis of merit.
(d) Selection and retention.
(1) Selection and retention. Departments and agencies have final
responsibility for selection of Vermont Internship Program candidates using
criteria and procedures to be issued by the Department of Human Resources.
* * *
(e) Development of candidates.
(1) Development of candidates. All Vermont Internship Program
members shall have individual development plans approved by the
Commissioner of Human Resources.
* * *
(f) Rights of Vermont Internship Program members.
(1) Rights of Vermont Internship Program members. Vermont
Internship Program participants shall be deemed to be classified State
employees in their initial probationary period for the entire period of their
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 14 of 97
2025
participation, and continuation of one’s training in Vermont Internship
Programs shall be in the discretion of the appointing authority. They shall be
paid the minimum rate for comparable positions in the classified service,
unless otherwise authorized by the Commissioner of Human Resources.
(2) Vermont Internship Program participants shall agree to work in a
State position consistent with the approved plan after completion of the
planned Vermont internship for a period of time equal to the length of Vermont
Internship Program participation. Any Vermont Internship Program member
who does not satisfy this requirement shall reimburse the State for all tuition,
fees and/or and expenses paid by the State in connection with Vermont
Internship Program participation, including salary paid during periods of paid
educational leave, unless waived by the Commissioner of Human Resources.
* * *
(8) Nothing provided herein for in this section shall be construed to be
inconsistent with or in violation of section 310 or 312 of this title.
* * *
Sec. 10. 3 V.S.A. chapter 16 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 16. VERMONT EMPLOYEES’ RETIREMENT SYSTEM
* * *
§ 457. MEMBERS
* * *
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 15 of 97
2025
(d) Should any Group A, C, D, F, or G member who has less than five
years of creditable service in any period of five consecutive years after last
becoming a member be absent from service more than three years or should the
member withdraw his or her the member’s contributions, or become a
beneficiary or die, the member shall thereupon then cease to be a member.
However, the membership of any employee entering such classes of military or
naval service of the United States as may be approved by resolution of the
Retirement Board, shall be continued during such military or naval service if
the member does not withdraw his or her contributions, but no such member
shall be considered in the service of the State for the purpose of the Retirement
System during such military or naval service, except as provided in subsection
458(e) of this title.
* * *
§ 458. CREDITABLE SERVICE; MILITARY SERVICE
(a) With respect to service rendered prior to the date of membership, each
employee who, pursuant to subsection 457(a) of this title, became a member of
the retirement system shall have included as prior service hereunder all service
credited to him or her the employee as creditable service under the terms of
one or both of the predecessor systems, provided his or her the employee’s
membership continues unbroken until his or her the employee’s retirement.
* * *
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 16 of 97
2025
(c) The Retirement Board shall fix and determine by appropriate rules and
regulations how much service in any year is equivalent to one year of service,
but in no case shall it allow credit for a period of absence without pay of more
than a month’s duration, except as provided under subsection (e) of this
section, nor shall more than one year of service be creditable for all service in
one calendar year. Service rendered for the full normal working time in any
year shall be equivalent to one year’s service, but in no case shall less than 40
calendar weeks be regarded as full normal working time.
* * *
§ 467. DEATH BENEFIT AFTER RETIREMENT—GROUP C
If a group C member in receipt of a retirement allowance dies, his or her the
member’s dependent spouse shall receive until her or his the dependent’s death
a retirement allowance which shall be equal to 70 percent of the retirement
allowance to which the member was then entitled, without optional
modification, irrespective of whether such the member had elected an option
hereunder pursuant to this chapter.
§ 468. OPTIONAL BENEFITS
(a) Until the first payment on account of a retirement allowance becomes
normally due, any member may elect to convert the retirement allowance
otherwise payable to the member after retirement into a retirement allowance
that is its actuarial equivalent, in accordance with one of the optional forms
described in this section.
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 17 of 97
2025
* * *
(2) [Deleted.]
* * *
§ 469. MINIMUM BENEFIT—GROUP C
Anything contained in this title to the contrary notwithstanding, the benefit
payable to or on account of a group C member hereunder, inclusive of any
benefit provided by his additional contributions as specified in subsection
473(b) of this title together with the Social Security benefit or survivor’s
insurance benefit, as the case may be, shall not be less than the benefit which
that would have been payable to him or her the member or on his or her the
member’s account under the provisions of the Vermont State Police and Motor
Vehicle Inspectors’ Retirement System as in effect on June 30, 1972 had said
System continued in effect unamended.
§ 470. POSTRETIREMENT ADJUSTMENTS TO RETIREMENT
ALLOWANCES
* * *
(b) Calculation of net percentage increase.
* * *
(3) Consumer Price Index; increases. In the event of an increase in the
Consumer Price Index, and provided there remains an increase following the
application of any offset as in subdivision (2) of this subsection, that amount
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 18 of 97
2025
shall be identified as the net percentage increase and used to determine the
members’ postretirement adjustment as described herein in this chapter.
* * *
§ 471. RETIREMENT BOARD; MEDICAL BOARD; ACTUARY; RATES
OF CONTRIBUTION; SAFEKEEPING OF SECURITIES
* * *
(d) Subject to the limitations of this subchapter, the Retirement Board shall,
from time to time, establish adopt rules and regulations for the administration
of the Fund of the Retirement System and for the transaction of its business.
* * *
(l) The Commission shall designate from time to time a depositary for the
securities and evidences of indebtedness held in the Fund of the System and
may contract for the safekeeping of securities and evidences of indebtedness
within and without the State of Vermont in such banks, trust companies, and
safe-deposit facilities as it shall from time to time determine. The necessary
and incidental expenses of such safekeeping and for service rendered,
including advisory services in investment matters, shall be paid from the
operation expenses of the System as hereinafter provided set forth in this
chapter. Any agreement for the safekeeping of securities or evidences of
indebtedness shall provide for the access to such securities and evidences of
indebtedness, except securities loaned pursuant to a securities lending
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 19 of 97
2025
agreement as authorized by subsection (m) of this section, at any time by the
custodian or any authorized agent of the State for audit or other purposes.
* * *
§ 472. INVESTMENTS; INTEREST RATE; DISBURSEMENTS
* * *
(d) Except as otherwise herein provided for in this section, no trustee and
no employee of the Board or member of the Commission shall have any direct
interest in the gains or profits of any investment made by the Commission; nor
shall any trustee or employee of the Board or the Commission, directly or
indirectly, for himself or herself the trustee or employee or as an agent, in any
manner use the same except to make such current and necessary payments as
are authorized by the Board or Commission; nor shall any trustee or employee
of the Board or the Commission become an endorser or surety, or in any
manner an obligor, for the monies loaned to or borrowed from the Board. The
Treasurer, with the approval of the Board and the Commission, shall adopt by
rule standards of conduct for trustees and employees of the Board in order to
maintain and promote public confidence in the integrity of the Board. Such
rules shall prohibit trustees and employees from receiving or soliciting any
gift, including meals, alcoholic beverages, travel fare, room and board, or any
other thing of value, tangible or intangible, from any vendor or potential
vendor of investment services, management services, brokerage services, and
other services to the Board or Commission.
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 20 of 97
2025
* * *
§ 473. FUNDS
* * *
(b) Member contributions.
* * *
(3) Deductions. The deductions provided for herein in this section shall
be made notwithstanding that the minimum compensation provided for by law
for any member shall be reduced thereby. Every member shall be deemed to
consent and agree to the deductions made and provided herein for in this
section and shall receipt for full compensation, and payment of compensation
less such deduction shall be a full and complete discharge and acquittance of
all claims and demands whatsoever for the services rendered by such person
during the period covered by such payment, except as to the benefits provided
under this subchapter.
(4) Additional contributions. Subject to the approval of the Retirement
Board, in addition to the contributions deducted from compensation as
hereinbefore provided for in this section, any member may redeposit in the
Fund by a single payment or by an increased rate of contribution an amount
equal to the total amount that the member previously withdrew from this
System or one of the predecessor systems; or any member may deposit therein
in the Fund by a single payment or by an increased rate of contribution an
amount computed to be sufficient to purchase an additional annuity that,
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 21 of 97
2025
together with prospective retirement allowance, will provide for the member a
total retirement allowance not in excess of one-half of average final
compensation at normal retirement date, with the exception of Group D
members for whom creditable service shall be restored upon redeposits of
amounts previously withdrawn from the System, or for whom creditable
service shall be granted upon deposit of amounts equal to what would have
been paid if payment had been made during any period of service during which
such a member did not contribute. Such additional amounts so deposited shall
become a part of the member’s accumulated contributions as additional
contributions.
* * *
§ 474. PREDECESSOR SYSTEMS
Any beneficiary of a predecessor system who is in receipt of a benefit on
the date of establishment shall become a beneficiary hereunder and shall
continue to receive the benefit being paid from the Fund of this System, under
the conditions of the predecessor system as in effect at the time of the
member’s retirement, subject to such adjustment as provided for in section 470
of this title. Any former member of a predecessor system who, upon
termination of service, was eligible for a deferred benefit under the provisions
of that System, the payment of which has not commenced as of the date of
establishment, shall continue to be so eligible, and shall receive such benefit
from the System subject to the conditions of the predecessor system as in effect
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 22 of 97
2025
at the time the member’s service was terminated. The cash and securities to
the credit of the predecessor systems on the date of establishment shall be
transferred to this Retirement System, the amount of each member’s
accumulated contributions included in such transfer shall be credited to the
member’s individual account in the fund to become a part of the member’s
accumulated contributions, and the balance shall be credited to the Fund.
* * *
§ 483. PETITION BY EMPLOYEES; TRANSFER OF ASSETS
(a) Should a majority of the members of any local retirement fund elect to
become members of the Vermont State Retirement System, by a petition duly
signed by such those members, the participation of such those members in the
Vermont State Retirement System may be effected as provided in section 482
of this title as though such local retirement fund were not in operation and the
provisions of this section shall thereupon then apply, except that the existing
pensioners or annuitants of the local retirement fund who were being paid
benefits on the date such that participation in the Vermont State Retirement
System becomes effective shall be continued and paid at their existing rates by
the Vermont State Retirement System and the liability on this account shall be
included in the computation of the accrued liability contribution rate as
provided by section 487 of this title. Any cash and securities to the credit of
the local retirement fund shall be transferred to the Vermont State Retirement
System as of the date participation begins. The trustees or other administrative
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 23 of 97
2025
head of the local retirement fund as of the date participation becomes effective
shall certify the proportion, if any, of the assets of the local retirement fund
that represents the accumulated contributions of the members, and the relative
shares of the members as of that date. Such shares Shares shall be credited to
the respective account of such members in the Fund of the Vermont State
Retirement System as though contributed under the provisions of said System.
The balance of the assets transferred to the Vermont State Retirement System
shall be offset against the accrued liability before determining the special
accrued liability contribution to be paid by the employer as provided by section
487 of this title. The operation of the local retirement fund shall be
discontinued as of the date participation becomes effective.
* * *
§ 490. DEFAULT; PAID UP DEFERRED ANNUITY
The agreement of any employer to contribute on account of its employees
shall be irrevocable, but should any employer for any reason become
financially unable to make the contributions on account of its employees as
provided in this subchapter, then such that employer shall be deemed to be in
default. All members of the Vermont State Retirement System who were
employed by such an employer at the time of default shall thereupon then be
entitled to discontinue membership in such the Retirement System and to a
refund of their previous contributions upon demand made within 90 days
thereafter. As of a date 90 days following the date of such the default, the
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 24 of 97
2025
actuary of the Vermont State Retirement System shall determine by actuarial
valuation the amount of the reserve held on account of each remaining active
member and beneficiary of such the employer and shall credit to each such
member and beneficiary the amount of the reserve so held. The reserve so
credited, together with the amount of the accumulated contributions of each
such active member, shall be used to provide for him or her the member a paid
up deferred annuity beginning at age 65, and the reserve of each beneficiary
shall be used in providing such part of his or her the member’s existing
pension as the reserve so held will provide, which pension, together with his or
her the member’s annuity, shall thereafter be payable to him or her the
member. The rights and privileges of both active members and beneficiaries of
such the employer shall thereupon then terminate, except as to payment of the
deferred annuities so provided and the annuities and pensions, or parts thereof,
provided for the beneficiaries.
* * *
§ 495. TRANSFER OF MEMBERSHIPS
* * *
(e) The Board of Trustees of the Vermont State Retirement System, the
State Teachers’ Retirement System of Vermont and the Municipal Employees’
Retirement System are severally authorized to make such adopt rules and
regulations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
* * *
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 25 of 97
2025
Sec. 11. 3 V.S.A. § 535(b) is amended to read:
(b) Waivers. The Treasurer is authorized to establish a rule waiving the
penalty for a covered employer that fails to be in compliance with this chapter
for which it is established that the covered employer did not know that the
failure existed and exercised reasonable diligence to meet the requirements of
this chapter, provided that:
(1) no penalty shall be imposed on any failure for which it is established
that the covered employer subject to liability for the penalty did not know that
the failure existed and exercised reasonable diligence to meet the requirements
of this subsection above chapter;
* * *
Sec. 12. 3 V.S.A. chapter 19 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 19. SOCIAL SECURITY FOR STATE AND MUNICIPAL
EMPLOYEES
§ 571. DECLARATION OF POLICY
In order to extend to employees of the State and its political subdivisions
and to the dependents and survivors of such those employees the basic
protection accorded to others by the Old Age and Survivors Insurance System
embodied in the Social Security Act, the State of Vermont authorizes and
empowers the Treasurer of the State as a State agency to enter into appropriate
agreements with the Secretary of Health and Human Services for the purpose
of making available under the provisions of this chapter, to employees of the
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 26 of 97
2025
State and its political subdivisions, the benefits of the Social Security Act. It is
also the policy of the legislature General Assembly that the federal-State
agreement permitted by this chapter be made applicable to the services of all
employees of the State of Vermont to the extent and in the manner permitted
by the federal Social Security Act.
§ 572. DEFINITIONS
For the purposes of this chapter:
* * *
(8) “Wages” means all remuneration for employment as defined herein
in subsection (2) of this section, including the cash value of all remuneration
paid in any medium other than cash, except that such term wages shall not
include that part of such remuneration which, even if it were for “employment”
within the meaning of the federal Insurance Contributions Act, would not
constitute “wages” within the meaning of that Act.
* * *
§ 575. PLANS FOR COVERAGE OF EMPLOYEES OF POLITICAL
SUBDIVISIONS
(a) Each political subdivision of the State, acting through its legislative
branch in the case of a municipality, or through its governing body in the case
of an instrumentality, is hereby authorized, and in the case of any political
subdivision employing teachers is required, to submit for approval by the State
agency a plan for extending the benefits of Title II of the Social Security Act,
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 27 of 97
2025
in conformity with applicable provisions of such act the Social Security Act, to
employees of such political subdivision. Each such plan and any amendment
thereof to that plan shall be approved by the State agency if it finds that such
the plan, or such the plan as amended, is in conformity with such the
requirements as are provided in regulations rules of the State agency, except
that no such plan shall be approved unless:
* * *
(6) it authorizes the State agency to terminate the plan in its entirety, in
the discretion of the State agency, if it finds that there has been a failure to
comply substantially with any provisions contained in such plan, such
termination to take effect at the expiration of such notice and on such
conditions as may be provided by regulations rules of the State agency and
may be consistent with the provisions of the Social Security Act.
* * *
(c)(1) Each political subdivision as to which a plan has been approved
under this section is authorized to and shall pay into the Contribution Fund,
with respect to wages (as defined in section 572 of this title), at such time or
times as the State agency may by regulation rule prescribe, contributions in the
amounts and at the rates specified in the applicable agreement entered into by
the State agency under section 573 of this title.
* * *
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 28 of 97
2025
§ 577. REGULATIONS RULES
The State agency shall make and publish such adopt rules and regulations,
not inconsistent consistent with the provisions of this chapter, as it finds
necessary or appropriate to for the efficient administration of the functions
with which it is charged under this chapter.
* * *
Sec. 13. 3 V.S.A. chapter 20 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 20. VERMONT BABY BOND TRUST
* * *
§ 603. TREASURER’S TRUST AUTHORITY
The Treasurer, on behalf of the Trust and for purposes of the Trust, may:
* * *
(5) adopt rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 of this title;
* * *
§ 607. ACCOUNTING FOR DESIGNATED BENEFICIARY; CLAIMS
REQUIREMENTS
* * *
(e) The Treasurer shall adopt rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 of this
title to carry out the purposes of this section, including prescribing the process
for submitting a valid claim for accounting.
* * *
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 29 of 97
2025
Sec. 14. 3 V.S.A. chapter 27 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 27. STATE EMPLOYEES LABOR RELATIONS ACT
* * *
§ 907. DESIGNATION OF SUPERVISORY EMPLOYEES
Classified employees in the management unit certified by the Board, who
are determined to be supervisory employees as defined by section 902 of this
title and who are not determined to be managerial or confidential employees as
defined by section 902 of this title, shall remain members of that unit, which
shall hereinafter be referred to as the “supervisory” unit. Employees who are
determined to be supervisory employees under the provisions of section 906 of
this title shall become members of the supervisory unit. A representative
election shall not be required as a result of this change.
* * *
§ 926. GRIEVANCES
(a) The Board shall hear and make a final determination on the grievances
of all employees who are eligible to appeal grievances to the Board. Grievance
hearings at the Board level shall be conducted in accordance with the rules and
regulations adopted by the Board. The right to institute grievance proceedings
extends to individual employees, groups of employees, and collective
bargaining units.
* * *
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 30 of 97
2025
(e) Any collective bargaining agreement that contains a binding arbitration
provision pursuant to this section shall include an acknowledgement of
arbitration that provides substantially the following:
ACKNOWLEDGEMENT OF ARBITRATION
(The parties) understand that this agreement contains a provision for binding
arbitration as a final step of the grievance process. After the effective date of
this agreement, no grievance, submitted to binding arbitration, may be brought
to the Vermont Labor Relations Board. An employee who has declined
representation by the employee organization or whom the employee
organization has declined to represent or is unable to represent, shall be
entitled, either by representing himself or herself or with the assistance of
independent legal counsel, to appeal his or her grievance to the Vermont Labor
Relations Board as the final step of the grievance process in accordance with
the rules and regulations adopted by the Board.
* * *
(i) The Board shall hear and make a final determination on the grievances
of all retired individual employees of the University of Vermont, groups of
such retired individuals, and retired collective bargaining unit members of the
University of Vermont. Grievances shall be limited to those relating to
compensation and benefits that were accrued during active employment but are
received after retirement. As used in this subsection, “grievance” means an
allegation of a violation of a collective bargaining agreement, employee
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 31 of 97
2025
handbook provision, early retirement plan, individual separation agreement or
other documented agreement, or rule or regulation of the University of
Vermont.
§ 927. APPROPRIATE UNIT
(a) The Board shall decide the unit appropriate for the purpose of collective
bargaining in each case and those employees to be included therein in that unit,
in order to assure ensure the employees the fullest freedom in exercising the
rights guaranteed by this chapter.
* * *
§ 965. PREVENTION OF UNFAIR PRACTICES
(a) The Board may prevent any person from engaging in any unfair labor
practice listed in sections 961–962 of this title. Whenever a charge is made
that any person has engaged in or is engaging in any unfair labor practice, the
Board may issue and cause to be served upon that person a complaint stating
the charges in that respect and containing a notice of hearing before the Board
at a place and time therein fixed at least seven days after the complaint is
served. The Board may amend the complaint at any time before it issues an
order based thereon. No complaint shall issue based on any unfair labor
practice occurring more than six months prior to the filing of the charge with
the Board and the service of a copy thereof upon the person against whom such
charge is made, unless the person aggrieved thereby was prevented from filing
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 32 of 97
2025
the charge by reason of service in the U.S. Armed Forces, in which event the
six-month period shall be computed from the day of his or her discharge.
* * *
Sec. 15. 3 V.S.A. § 1021(a) is amended to read:
(a) The Board shall determine issues of unit determination, certification,
and representation in accordance with this chapter and the provisions of section
941 of this title. The Board shall decide the appropriate unit for collective
bargaining in each case and the employees to be included in that unit to assure
ensure the employees the fullest freedom in exercising the rights guaranteed by
this chapter.
Sec. 16. 3 V.S.A. § 1228(b) is amended to read:
(b) Open meetings. All Commission hearings shall be considered meetings
of the Commission as described in subsection 1221(e) of this title, and shall be
conducted in accordance with 1 V.S.A. § 310 et seq.
Sec. 17. 3 V.S.A. § 2291a is amended to read:
§ 2291a. STATE AGENCY PLANNING AND COORDINATION
State agencies shall engage in a continuing planning process to assure
ensure that programs and actions are consistent with the goals established in
the State Agency Energy Plan required by section 2291 of this title. This
planning process shall be coordinated in a manner established by the
Commissioner of Buildings and General Services.
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 33 of 97
2025
Sec. 18. 3 V.S.A. chapter 47 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 47. COMMERCE AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT
* * *
§ 2453. PERMISSIVE DUTIES; APPROVAL OF SECRETARY
The commissioner may, with the approval of the Secretary:
* * *
(2) Transfer classified positions within or between divisions subject only
to State personnel laws and regulations rules.
* * *
(5) Make regulations Adopt rules consistent with law for the internal
administration of the department and its programs.
* * *
§ 2477. RENTAL HOUSING ADVISORY BOARD
* * *
(c) The Board shall have the following powers and duties:
(1) to act as an advisory group to the Governor, General Assembly, and
appropriate State agencies on issues related to rental housing statutes, policies,
and regulations rules;
* * *
(4) to provide guidance to the State on the implementation of programs,
policies, and regulations rules better to support decent, safe, and sanitary
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 34 of 97
2025
housing, including recommendations for incentives and programs to assist
landlords with building repairs;
(5) to provide information to community partners, municipalities,
landlords, and tenants, including educational materials on applicable rental
housing statutes, regulations rules, and ordinances; and
* * *
Sec. 19. 3 V.S.A. chapter 51 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 51. NATURAL RESOURCES
* * *
§ 2803. ADVISORY CAPACITY
* * *
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section or any other provision of
this chapter, the Fish and Wildlife Board and the Land Use Review Board shall
retain and exercise all powers and functions given to them by law which are of
regulatory or quasi-judicial nature, including the power to adopt, amend, and
repeal rules and regulations, to conduct hearings, to adjudicate controversies,
and to issue and enforce orders, in the manner and to the extent to which those
powers are given to those respective boards by law.
* * *
§ 2828. PROJECT SCOPING PROCESS
* * *
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 35 of 97
2025
(e) Notice of project scoping meeting. The applicant shall notice the
proposed project scoping meeting, at least 30 days prior to the date of the
meeting, by sending a copy of the project review sheet by first class mail,
postage prepaid, to each of the following: the owner of the land where the
project is located if the applicant is not the owner; the municipality in which
the project is located; the Municipal and Regional Planning Commissions for
any municipality in which the project is located; if the project site is located on
a boundary, any Vermont municipality adjacent to that boundary and the
Municipal and Regional Planning Commissions for that municipality; any state
agency identified on the project scoping sheet as being affected by the project;
and all adjoining landowners and residents. In addition, the applicant shall
assure ensure that this notice is published in a newspaper of general circulation
in the area of the proposed project. The applicant shall furnish by affidavit to
the Secretary the names of those furnished notice.
* * *
§ 2853. PERMISSIVE DUTIES; APPROVAL OF SECRETARY
The commissioner with the approval of the Secretary, may:
* * *
(2) Transfer classified positions within or between divisions subject only
to State personnel laws and regulations rules.
* * *
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 36 of 97
2025
(5) Make regulations Adopt rules consistent with law for the internal
administration of the department and its programs.
* * *
Sec. 20. 3 V.S.A. chapter 59 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 59. COMMUNITY SERVICES AGENCIES
* * *
§ 3902. OFFICE OF ECONOMIC OPPORTUNITY
* * *
(b) The Director may provide financial assistance to community services
agencies for the planning, conduct, administration and evaluation of
community service programs to provide a range of services and activities
having a measurable and potentially major impact on causes of poverty in the
community or in areas of the community where poverty is a particularly acute
problem. Components of those services and activities may involve, without
limitation of other activities and supporting facilities designed to assist low
income participants:
* * *
(10) to coordinate and establish linkages between governmental and
other social service programs to assure ensure the effective delivery of such
services to low-income persons; and to encourage the use of entities in the
private sector of the community in efforts to ameliorate poverty in the
community.
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 37 of 97
2025
(c) The Director is authorized to adopt rules pursuant to chapter 25 of this
title appropriate to the carrying out of this chapter and the its purposes.
* * *
§ 3905. COMMUNITY SERVICES AGENCIES; ADMINISTRATION
* * *
(b) Each board of a nonprofit community based organization that is
designated a community services agency under section 3903 of this chapter
shall have an executive committee of not more than seven members who shall
be representative of the composition of the board and the board shall be so
constituted that:
* * *
(2) one-third of the members of the board are persons chosen in
accordance with election procedures adequate to assure ensure that they are
representative of the poor in the area served; and
* * *
Sec. 21. 3 V.S.A. § 4020(a) is amended to read:
(a) State agencies that have programs or take actions affecting land use, as
determined by Executive Order of the Governor, shall engage in a continuing
planning process to assure ensure that those programs and actions are
consistent with the goals established in 24 V.S.A. § 4302 and compatible with
regional and approved municipal plans, as those terms are defined in that
section. This planning process shall be coordinated, in a manner established
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 38 of 97
2025
by Executive Order of the Governor, with the planning process of other
agencies and of regional and municipal entities of the regions in which the
programs and actions are to have effect.
* * * Title 5 * * *
Sec. 22. 5 V.S.A. § 1019 is amended to read:
§ 1019. CONDEMNATION; APPEALS
(a) The political subdivision within which the property or nonconforming
structure or use is located, or the political subdivision owning the airport or
served by it, may acquire such air right, navigation easement, or other estate or
interest in the property or nonconforming structure or use in question, as may
be necessary, by purchase or grant or condemnation in the manner provided
under 5 19 V.S.A. chapter 5 in any case in which:
* * *
* * * Title 7 * * *
Sec. 23. 7 V.S.A. § 656(f) is amended to read:
(f) Diversion Program requirements.
* * *
(6) Notwithstanding 3 V.S.A. §§ 163(a)(2)(C) and 164(a)(2)(C) any
provision of law to the contrary, the adult or juvenile diversion programs shall
accept cases from the Youth Substance Awareness Safety Program pursuant to
this section. The confidentiality provisions of 3 V.S.A. § 163 or 164 shall
become effective when a notice of violation is issued pursuant to subsection
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 39 of 97
2025
(b) of this section and shall remain in effect unless the person fails to register
with or complete the Youth Substance Awareness Safety Program.
* * * Title 9 * * *
Sec. 24. 9 V.S.A. § 4501 is amended to read:
§ 4501. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(8) “Public accommodation” means an individual, organization, or
governmental, or other entity that owns, leases, leases to, or operates a place of
public accommodation.
* * *
(10) “Undue burden” means significant difficulty or expense. In
determining whether an action would result in an undue burden, the following
factors shall be considered:
* * *
(B) the overall financial resources of the site or sites involved in the
action; the number of persons employed at the site; the effect on expenses and
resources; legitimate safety requirements necessary for safe operation,
including crime prevention measures, or; and any other impact of the action on
the operation of the site;
(C) the geographic separateness and the administrative or fiscal
relationship of the site or sites in question to any parent corporation or entity;
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 40 of 97
2025
(D) if applicable, the overall financial resources of any parent
corporation or entity; the overall size of the parent corporation or entity with
respect to the number of its employees; and the number, type, and location of
its facilities; and
(E) if applicable, the type of operation or operations of any parent
corporation or entity, including the composition, structure, and functions of the
workforce of the parent corporation or entity.
* * *
* * * Title 13 * * *
Sec. 25. 13 V.S.A. § 7554(a) is amended to read:
(a) Release; conditions of release. Any person charged with an offense,
other than a person held without bail under section 7553 or 7553a of this title,
shall at the person’s appearance before a judicial officer be ordered released
pending trial in accordance with this section.
(1) The defendant shall be ordered released on personal recognizance or
upon the execution of an unsecured appearance bond in an amount specified by
the judicial officer unless the judicial officer determines that such a release will
not reasonably mitigate the risk of flight from prosecution as required. In
determining whether the defendant presents a risk of flight from prosecution,
the judicial officer shall consider, in addition to any other factors, the
seriousness of the offense charged; the number of offenses with which the
person is charged; whether, at the time of the current offense or arrest, the
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 41 of 97
2025
defendant was released on conditions or personal recognizance, on probation,
furlough, parole, or other release pending trial, sentencing, appeal, or
completion of a sentence for an offense under federal or state law; and
whether, in connection with a criminal prosecution, the defendant is compliant
with court orders or has failed to appear at a court hearing. If the judicial
officer determines that the defendant presents a risk of flight from prosecution,
the officer shall, either in lieu of or in addition to the methods of release in this
section, impose the least restrictive of the following conditions or the least
restrictive combination of the following conditions that will reasonably
mitigate the risk of flight of the defendant as required:
* * *
(H) Place the defendant in the pretrial supervision program pursuant
to section 7555 of this title, provided that the defendant meets the criteria
identified in subdivision 7551(c)(1) subdivisions 7555(d)(2)–(3) of this title.
* * *
(2) If the judicial officer determines that conditions of release imposed
to mitigate the risk of flight will not reasonably protect the public, the judicial
officer may impose, in addition, the least restrictive of the following conditions
or the least restrictive combination of the following conditions that will
reasonably ensure protection of the public:
* * *
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 42 of 97
2025
(G) Place the defendant in the pretrial supervision program pursuant
to section 7555 of this title, provided that the defendant meets the criteria
identified in subdivision 7551(c)(1) subdivisions 7555(d)(2)–(3) of this title.
* * *
* * * Title 18 * * *
Sec. 26. 18 V.S.A. § 4230b(f) is amended to read:
(f) Diversion Program requirements.
* * *
(6) Notwithstanding 3 V.S.A. §§ 163(a)(2)(C) and 164(a)(2)(C) any law
to the contrary, the adult or juvenile diversion programs shall accept cases
from the Youth Substance Awareness Safety Program pursuant to this section,
subdivision 4230f(e)(1) of this title, or subdivision 4230f(e)(2) of this title.
The confidentiality provisions of 3 V.S.A. § 163 or 164 shall become effective
when a notice of violation is issued pursuant to subsection (b) of this section,
subdivision 4230f(e)(1) of this title, or subdivision 4230f(e)(2) of this title and
shall remain in effect unless the person fails to register with or complete the
Youth Substance Awareness Safety Program.
Sec. 27. 18 V.S.A. § 9351(d) is amended to read:
(d) The Health Information Technology Plan shall serve as the framework
within which the Green Mountain Care Board reviews certificate of need
applications for information technology under section 9440b of this title. In
addition, the Commissioner of Information and Innovation Secretary of Digital
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 43 of 97
2025
Services shall use the Health Information Technology Plan as the basis for
independent review of State information technology procurements.
* * * Title 19 * * *
Sec. 28. 19 V.S.A. § 10 is amended to read:
§ 10. DUTIES
The Agency shall, except where otherwise specifically provided by law:
* * *
(15) Respond in writing to concerns raised during Transportation Board
hearings conducted pursuant to the provisions of subdivision 5(d)(6) and
subsection 10g(d) of this title.
* * *
* * * Title 20 * * *
Sec. 29. 20 V.S.A. § 2371(c) is amended to read:
(c) Code contents. The Law Enforcement Officers’ Code of Conduct shall
prohibit the following categories of conduct:
* * *
(2) untruthfulness, including in the course of criminal investigations, in
law enforcement agencies’ internal affairs investigations, in Council
investigations, in matters before a tribunal, and in the preparation,
administration, or taking of any official examination conducted by a law
enforcement agency of the Council;
* * *
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 44 of 97
2025
* * * Title 21 * * *
Sec. 30. 21 V.S.A. chapter 5 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 5. EMPLOYMENT PRACTICES
* * *
§ 472. LEAVE
(a) During any 12-month period, an employee shall be entitled to take
unpaid leave for a period not to exceed 12 weeks:
(1) for parental leave, during the employee’s pregnancy and following
the birth of an employee’s child or within a year following the initial
placement of a child 16 years of age or younger with the employee for the
purpose of adoption.; or
* * *
§ 472a. SHORT-TERM FAMILY LEAVE
(a) In addition to the leave provided in section 472 of this title, an
employee shall be entitled to take unpaid leave not to exceed four hours in any
30-day period and not to exceed 24 hours in any 12-month period. An
employer may require that leave be taken in a minimum of two-hour segments
and may be taken for any of the following purposes:
(1) To to participate in preschool or school activities directly related to
the academic educational advancement of the employee’s child, stepchild,
foster child, or ward who lives with the employee, such as a parent-teacher
conference.;
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 45 of 97
2025
(2) To to attend or to accompany the employee’s child, stepchild, foster
child, or ward who lives with the employee or the employee’s parent, spouse,
or parent-in-law to routine medical or dental appointments.;
(3) To to accompany the employee’s parent, spouse, or parent-in-law to
other appointments for professional services related to their care and well-
being.; or
(4) To to respond to a medical emergency involving the employee’s
child, stepchild, foster child, or ward who lives with the employee or the
employee’s parent, spouse, or parent-in-law.
* * *
§ 482. EARNED SICK TIME
* * *
(c) An employer may:
* * *
(2) limit to 40 hours the number of hours in each workweek for which
full-time employees not subject to the overtime provisions of the Federal Fair
Labor Standards Act, pursuant to 29 U.S.C. § 213(a)(1), may accrue earned
sick time pursuant to this section.
* * *
§ 495d. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
* * *
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 46 of 97
2025
(7) “Physical or mental impairment” means:
(A)(i) any physiological disorder or condition, cosmetic
disfigurement, or anatomical loss affecting one or more of the following body
systems: neurological; musculoskeletal; special sense organs; respiratory,
including speech organs; cardiovascular; reproductive; digestive; genito-
urinary; hemic and lymphatic; skin; or endocrine;
(B)(ii) any mental or psychological disorder, such as developmental
disability, organic brain syndrome, emotional or mental condition or
psychiatric disability, and specific learning disabilities;
(C)(B) the term “physical or mental impairment” includes diseases and
conditions such as orthopedic, visual, speech and hearing impairments,
cerebral palsy, epilepsy, muscular dystrophy, multiple sclerosis, cancer, heart
disease, diabetes, intellectual disability, emotional illness, and drug addiction
and alcoholism.
* * *
Sec. 31. 21 V.S.A. chapter 9 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 9. EMPLOYER’S LIABILITY AND WORKERS’
COMPENSATION
* * *
§ 624. DUAL LIABILITY; CLAIMS, SETTLEMENT PROCEDURE
(a)(1) Where the injury for which compensation is payable under the
provisions of this chapter was caused under circumstances creating a legal
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 47 of 97
2025
liability to pay the resulting damages in some person other than the employer,
the acceptance of compensation benefits or the commencement of proceedings
to enforce compensation payments shall not act as an election of remedies, but
the injured employee or the employee’s personal representative may also
proceed to enforce the liability of the third party for damages in accordance
with the provisions of this section.
(2) If the injured employee or the employee’s personal representative
does not commence the action within one year after the occurrence of the
personal injury, then the employer or its insurance carrier may, within the time
for the commencement of actions established by statute, enforce the liability of
the third party in the name of the injured employee or the employee’s personal
representative.
(3) Not less than 30 days before the commencement of suit by any party
under this section, the party shall notify, by registered mail at their last known
address,:
(A) the Commissioner,;
(B)(i) the injured employee,; or
(ii) in the event of death, the employee’s known dependents, or
personal representative, or known next of kin,;
(C) the employee’s employer,; and
(D) the workers’ compensation insurance carrier.
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 48 of 97
2025
(4) Any party in interest shall have a right to join in the suit but the
direction and control of the suit shall be with the injured employee.
* * *
§ 635. PERIODS OF COMPENSATION
The compensation provided for by the provisions of this chapter shall be
payable during the following periods:
(1) Spouse.
(A) Spouse. To a spouse until the earlier of:
* * *
§ 662. AGREEMENTS; REQUIRED PAYMENTS IN ABSENCE OF
* * *
(b)(1) In the absence of an agreement pursuant to subsection (a) of this
section, the employer or insurance carrier shall notify the Commissioner and
the employee in writing that the claim is denied and the reasons for the denial.
(2) Upon the employee’s application for a hearing under section 663 of
this chapter, within 60 days after, the Commissioner shall review the evidence
upon which the denial is based. If the evidence does not reasonably support
the denial, the Commissioner shall order that payments be made until a hearing
is held and a decision is rendered.
* * *
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 49 of 97
2025
Sec. 32. 21 V.S.A. chapter 12 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 12. EMPLOYEE LEASING COMPANIES
* * *
§ 1038. DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
* * *
(b) An employee leasing company shall register with the Department of
Labor on a form required by the Commissioner of Labor and shall file the
following with the Commissioner:
(1) A a copy of each employee leasing agreement within 10 days after
the agreement is executed and notice within 10 days after an agreement is
terminated.;
(2) Payroll payroll records for each client company.; and
(3) On on or before December 31 of each year, a list of each client
company, including the client company’s name, address, State employer
account number, and federal employer identification number.
§ 1039. EMPLOYEE BENEFITS
* * *
(b) An employee leasing company that provides health insurance benefits
to its leased employees shall provide those benefits only pursuant to one of the
following:
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 50 of 97
2025
(1) an insurance policy issued under 8 V.S.A. chapter 107 by an insurer
or entity authorized to do business by the Commissioner of Financial
Regulation.; or
(2) a plan that has been qualified as a single employer plan under the
provisions of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act (ERISA), 29
U.S.C. § 1001 et seq., as amended.
* * *
§ 1042. UNPROFESSIONAL CONDUCT
Unprofessional conduct includes:
(1) Failure failure to maintain financial responsibility and management
competence.;
(2) Occupational occupational advertising that is intended or tends to
deceive the public.;
(3) Failure failure to comply with substantial provisions of State or
federal law governing the conduct of an employee leasing company.; and
(4) Conviction conviction of a crime related to the conduct of the
business of employee leasing by a controlling person of a licensee.
* * *
Sec. 33. 21 V.S.A. chapter 17 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 17. UNEMPLOYMENT COMPENSATION
* * *
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 51 of 97
2025
§ 1301. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(7) “Employment office” means a free public employment office, or
branch thereof, of the Vermont Employment Service Division, or an office
maintained by another state as a part of a state-controlled system of free public
employment offices, or by a federal agency or any agency of a foreign
government charged with the administration of an unemployment
compensation program or free public employment office, or such other
agencies as the U.S. Secretary of Labor may approve.
* * *
(9) “Total and partial unemployment.” “Total” and “partial”
unemployment shall be determined as follows:
(A) An individual shall be deemed “totally unemployed” in any week
during which the individual performs no services and with respect to which no
wages are earned by the individual.
(B) An individual shall be deemed “partially unemployed” in any
week of less than full-time work if the wages earned by the individual with
respect to the week are less than the weekly benefit amount the individual
would be entitled to receive if totally unemployed and eligible.
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 52 of 97
2025
(C) As used in this subdivision (9), “wages” includes only that part of
remuneration in any one week rounded to the next higher dollar that is in
excess of the amount specified in section 1338a of this subchapter.
(D) An individual’s week of unemployment shall be deemed to
commence only after the individual’s registration at an employment office,
except as the Vermont Employment Security Board may by rule otherwise
prescribe.
* * *
§ 1321. CONTRIBUTIONS; TAXABLE WAGE BASE CHANGES
* * *
(e) Contributions paid by political subdivisions. Any municipality, any
State institution of higher education, and any political or governmental
subdivisions or instrumentalities of the State shall pay contributions, unless it
elects to pay to the Commissioner for the Unemployment Compensation Trust
Fund, an amount equal to the amount of benefits paid, including the full
amount of extended benefits paid, attrib- utable attributable to service by
individuals in the employ of the entity. Subsections (a) and (b) and
subdivisions (c)(3)(C) through (3)(F), inclusive, and subdi- visions
subdivisions (c)(4) through (6), inclusive, of this section as they apply to
nonprofit organizations shall also apply to the entities designated in this
subsection, except that these entities shall be liable for all benefits paid,
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 53 of 97
2025
including the full amount of extended benefits paid, attributable to service in
the employ of these entities.
* * *
(f) Payments in lieu of contributions considered self-insuring. Any
employer who makes payments in lieu of contributions under the provisions of
this section is considered to be self-insuring and shall pay to the Commissioner
for the Unemployment Compensation Trust Fund any amounts the
Commissioner finds to be due under this chapter, including benefits paid but
denied on appeal or benefits paid in error that cannot be properly charged
either against another employer who makes payments in lieu of contributions
or against the experience-rating record of another employer who pays
contributions. Benefits improperly paid where repay- meant repayment by the
claimant is ordered pursuant to subsection 1347(a) or (b) of this title will be
credited to the employer’s account when repayment from the claimant is
actually received by the Commissioner.
* * *
§ 1325. EMPLOYERS’ EXPERIENCE-RATING RECORDS;
DISCLOSURE TO SUCCESSOR ENTITY
* * *
(b)(1) Disclosure of contribution rate to successor entity. Any individual or
employing unit who in any manner succeeds to or acquires the organization,
trade, or business or substantially all of the assets of any employer who has
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 54 of 97
2025
been operating the business within two weeks prior to the acquisition, except
any assets retained by the employer incident to the liquidation of the
employer’s obligations, and who thereafter continues the acquired business
shall be considered to be a successor to the predecessor from whom the
business was acquired and, if not already an employer before the acquisition,
shall become an employer on the date of the acquisition. The Commissioner
shall transfer the experience-rating record of the predecessor employer to the
successor employer. If the successor was not an employer before the date of
acquisition, the successor’s rate of contribution for the remainder of the rate
year shall be the rate applicable to the predecessor employers with respect to
the period immediately preceding the date of acquisition if there was only one
predecessor or there were only predecessors with identical rates. If the
predecessors’ rates were not identical, the Commissioner shall determine a rate
based on the combined experience of all the predecessor employers. If the
successor was an employer before the date of acquisition, the contribution rate
that was assigned to the successor for the rate year in which the acquisition
occurred will remain assigned to the successor for the remainder of the rate
year, after which the experience-rating record of the predecessor shall be
combined with the experience rating of the successor to form the single
employer experience-rating record of the successor. At any time prior to the
issuance of the certificate required by subsection 1322(b) of this chapter, an
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 55 of 97
2025
employing unit shall, upon request of a potential successor, disclose to the
potential successor its current experience-rating record.
* * *
(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the following shall apply
to assignment of rates and transfers of experience:
* * *
(4) As used in this section:
(A) “Attempt to violate” means the intent to evade,
misrepresentation, or willful intentional nondisclosure.
* * *
Sec. 34. 21 V.S.A. chapter 19 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 19. VERMONT STATE LABOR RELATIONS ACT
* * *
§ 1543. APPROPRIATE UNIT; BASIS FOR DETERMINATION
(a) The Board shall decide in each case whether, in order to ensure the
employees have the fullest freedom in exercising the rights guaranteed by this
Act chapter, the unit appropriate for the purpose of collective bargaining is the
employer unit, craft unit, plant unit, or a subdivision thereof. However, the
Board shall not decide that:
* * *
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 56 of 97
2025
§ 1581. PETITIONS FOR ELECTION; FILING, INVESTIGATIONS,
HEARINGS, DETERMINATIONS
* * *
(b)(1) The Board shall investigate the petition and if it has reasonable cause
to believe that a question of representation exists shall provide for an
appropriate hearing before the Board itself, a Board member, or its agents
appointed for that purpose upon due notice. Written notice of the hearing shall
be mailed by certified mail to the parties named in the petition not less than
seven days before the hearing.
* * *
(3)(A) If the Board finds upon the record of the hearing that a petition to
be represented for collective bargaining filed pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(A)
of this section, which identifies a proposed bargaining representative, bears the
signatures of at least 50 percent plus one of the employees in the bargaining
unit, the Board shall certify the individual or labor organization identified as
the bargaining representative.
(B) Certification of a representative shall only be available pursuant
to this subdivision (B)(3) when no other individual or labor organization is
currently certified or recognized as the bargaining representative.
* * *
§ 1621. UNFAIR LABOR PRACTICES
* * *
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 57 of 97
2025
(b) It shall be an unfair labor practice for a labor organization or its agents:
* * *
(4)(i) To engage in, or to induce or encourage any individual employed
by any person to engage in, a strike or a refusal in the course of employment to
use, manufacture, process, transport, or otherwise handle or work on any
goods, articles, materials, or commodities or to perform any services; or (ii) to
threaten, coerce, or restrain any person where in either case an object thereof
is:
(A) Forcing or requiring any employer or self-employed person to
join any labor or employer organization or to enter into any agreement that is
prohibited by subsection (c) of this section.
(B) Forcing or requiring any person to cease using, selling, handling,
transporting, or otherwise dealing in the products of any other producer,
processor, or manufacturer, or to cease doing business with any other person,
or forcing or requiring any other employer to recognize or bargain with a labor
organization as the representative of employees unless such labor organization
has been certified as the representative of such employees under the provisions
of section 1581 of this title, but this subdivision shall not be construed to make
unlawful, where not otherwise unlawful, any primary strike or primary
picketing.
(C) Forcing or requiring any employer to recognize or bargain with a
particular labor organization as the employee’s representative if another labor
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 58 of 97
2025
organization has been certified as the representative of those employees under
section 1581 of this title.
(D) Forcing or requiring any employer to assign particular work to
employees in a particular labor organization or in a particular trade, craft, or
class rather than to employees in another labor organization or in another trade,
craft, or class, unless such employer is failing to conform to an order or
certification of the Board determining the bargaining representative for
employees performing such work. This subsection (b) shall not be construed
to make unlawful a refusal by any person to enter upon the premises of any
employer, other than the person’s own employer, if the employees of such
employer are engaged in a strike ratified or approved by a representative of
such employees whom the employer is required to recognize under this
chapter. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to prohibit publicity,
other than picketing, for the purpose of truthfully advising the public, including
consumers and members of a labor organization, that a product or products are
produced by an employer with whom the labor organization has a primary
dispute and are distributed by another employer, as long as such publicity does
not have an effect of inducing any individual employed by any person other
than the primary employer in the course of employment to refuse to pick up,
deliver, or transport any goods, or not to perform any services, at the
establishment of the employer engaged in such distribution.
* * *
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 59 of 97
2025
(8) Compulsory membership; employees’ rights. A labor organization
entering into an agreement requiring a person’s membership in the labor
organization as a condition of employment by the employer shall not:
* * *
(B) penalize a member for exercising a right guaranteed by the
Constitution or laws of the United States or the State of Vermont; or
(C) cause the discharge from employment of employees who refuse
membership in the labor organization because of religious beliefs.
* * *
§ 1622. PREVENTION OF UNFAIR LABOR PRACTICES
* * *
(e) In determining whether a complaint shall issue alleging a violation of
subdivision 1621(a)(1) or (2) of this title, and in deciding such cases, the same
regulations and rules of decision shall apply irrespective of whether or not
labor organization affected is affiliated with a labor organization national or
international in scope.
* * *
(g) Until the record in a case shall have been filed in a court, as hereinafter
provided pursuant to section 1623 of this chapter, the Board may at any time,
upon reasonable notice and in such manner as it shall deem proper, modify or
set aside, in whole or in part, any finding or order made or issued by it.
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 60 of 97
2025
§ 1623. JUDICIAL REVIEW
* * *
(g) The Board shall have the power upon issuance of a complaint as
provided for under this act chapter to petition the Superior Court within any
county wherein the unfair labor practice is alleged to have occurred, for
appropriate temporary relief or restraining order. Upon the filing of such
petition the court shall cause notice thereof to be served upon such person, and
thereupon, shall have jurisdiction to grant to the Board such temporary relief as
it deems just and proper.
* * *
Sec. 35. 21 V.S.A. chapter 20 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 20. INDEPENDENT DIRECT SUPPORT PROVIDERS
* * *
§ 1633. RIGHTS OF THE STATE
Subject to the rights guaranteed by this chapter and subject to all other
applicable laws, and rules, and regulations, nothing in this chapter shall be
construed to interfere with the right of the State to:
* * *
(3) comply with federal and State laws and regulations rules;
(4) enforce regulations rules and regulatory processes;
(5) develop regulations rules and regulatory processes that do not impair
existing contracts, subject to the duty to bargain over mandatory subjects of
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 61 of 97
2025
bargaining and to the rulemaking authority of the General Assembly and the
Human Services Board; and
* * *
§ 1638. PREVENTION OF UNFAIR PRACTICES
* * *
(e) In determining whether a complaint shall issue alleging a violation of
subsection 1637(b) or (c) of this title, and in deciding those cases, the same
regulations and rules of decision shall apply irrespective of whether or not a
labor organization affected is affiliated with a labor organization national or
international in scope.
* * *
§ 1641. RULES AND REGULATIONS
The Board shall make adopt rules and may amend and or rescind and adopt
such rules and regulations consistent with this chapter as may be necessary to
carry out the provisions of this chapter.
* * *
Sec. 36. 21 V.S.A. chapter 22 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 22. VERMONT MUNICIPAL LABOR RELATIONS ACT
* * *
§ 1723. DETERMINATION OF THE BARGAINING UNIT
Nothing in this chapter shall prevent a municipal employer from voluntarily
recognizing an employee organization as the exclusive bargaining agent.
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 62 of 97
2025
Voluntary recognition may be granted at the request of an employee
organization if:
(1) The employee organization demonstrates the support of a majority of
the employees and the bargaining unit it seeks to represent; and.
(2) No rival employee organization seeks to represent the same
individual employee or the same jobs or positions for which recognition is
being sought; and.
(3) The bargaining unit is appropriate under the standards set forth in
subsection 1724(c) of this title. This section shall not require voluntary
recognition of an employee organization by a municipal employer.
§ 1724. CERTIFICATION PROCEDURE
* * *
(d) Nothing in this chapter prohibits the waiving of hearings by stipulation
for a consent election in conformity with regulations and rules of decision of
the Board.
* * *
§ 1727. PREVENTION OF UNFAIR LABOR PRACTICES
* * *
(e) In determining whether a complaint shall issue alleging that an unfair
labor practice has been committed, and in deciding those cases, the same
regulations and rules of decision shall apply irrespective of whether the
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 63 of 97
2025
employee organization affected is affiliated with an employee organization
national or international in scope.
* * *
§ 1730. RESTRICTIONS ON STRIKES
(a) A strike shall not be prohibited unless:
(1) it occurs sooner than 30 days after the delivery of a factfinder’s
report to the parties pursuant to subsection 1732(e) of this title;
(2) it occurs after both parties have voluntarily submitted a dispute to
final and binding arbitration, or after a decision or award has been issued by
the arbitrator; or
(3) it will endanger the health, safety, or welfare of the public.
(b) A municipal employer may petition for an injunction or other
appropriate relief from the Superior Court within the county wherein such
strike in violation of this section is occurring or is about to occur.
(b)(c) A municipality in which a strike is permitted under this section shall
not permanently replace employees who participate in a strike.
* * *
§ 1732. FACT-FINDING
* * *
(d) In reaching his or her conclusions and recommendations, the fact finder
shall give weight to the following factors:
* * *
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 64 of 97
2025
(5) the average consumer prices for goods and services commonly
known as the cost of living; and
(6) the overall compensation presently received by the employees
including direct wages, fringe benefits, and continuity conditions and stability
of employment, and all other benefits received.
* * *
* * * Title 23 * * *
Sec. 37. 23 V.S.A. § 4 is amended to read:
§ 4. DEFINITIONS
Except as may otherwise be provided by law, and unless the context
otherwise requires in statutes relating to motor vehicles and enforcement of the
law regulating vehicles, as provided in this title and 20 V.S.A. part 5, the
following definitions shall apply:
* * *
(11) “Enforcement officers” shall include:
* * *
(B) For enforcement of offenses relating to parking of motor
vehicles, meter checkers and other duly authorized employees of a
municipality employed to assist in the enforcement of parking regulations
rules.
* * *
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 65 of 97
2025
Sec. 38. 23 V.S.A. chapter 7 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 7. REGISTRATION
* * *
§ 420. MOTOR TRUCK DEFINED
As used in this section and sections 415, 416, 420, and 421 of this title, the
words “motor truck” shall include any motor vehicle having a gross weight of
18,000 pounds or over, designed and used for the transportation of
merchandise or freight.
* * *
§ 450a. DEALER REGISTRATION; ELIGIBILITY
(a) A person shall not be eligible to register as a dealer unless the person:
(1) Has no previous record of willful violations of dealer laws or
regulations rules in this or any other jurisdiction.
* * *
Sec. 39. 23 V.S.A. chapter 9 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 9. OPERATOR’S LICENSES
* * *
§ 607. JUNIOR OPERATOR’S LICENSE
(a) A junior operator’s license may be issued initially only to persons who:
(1) are 16 and 17 years of age;
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 66 of 97
2025
(2) have passed the driver examination required in subchapter 2 of this
chapter and a driver education and training course approved by the
Commissioner of Motor Vehicles and the Secretary of Education; and
(3) have:
(A) possessed a learner’s permit for not less than one year;
(B) submitted on a form provided by the Department of Motor
Vehicles that is approved by the Commissioner, and certified by the operator’s
licensed parent or guardian, licensed or certified driver education instructor, or
licensed person at least 25 years of age that there was at least 40 hours of
practice behind the wheel, at least 10 of which was nighttime driving and that
the operator was accompanied by his or her licensed parent or guardian, a
licensed or certified driver education instructor, or another licensed individual
at least 25 years of age, riding in the front passenger seat; and
(C) maintained a driving record without a learner’s permit
suspension, revocation, or recall for six consecutive months prior to licensure.
* * *
§ 705. QUALIFICATIONS FOR INSTRUCTOR’S LICENSE
In order to qualify for an instructor’s license, each applicant shall:
* * *
(4) have five years’ experience as a licensed operator and be at least 21
years of age on date of application; and
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 67 of 97
2025
(5) pay the application and license fees prescribed in section 702 of this
title.
* * *
§ 708. REFUSAL TO ISSUE LICENSE
The Commissioner may refuse to issue a license to any applicant for a
driver’s training school license or instructor’s license when he or she the
Commissioner is satisfied that:
* * *
(4) the applicant has been convicted of a felony or any crime involving
violence, dishonesty, or deceit; and
(5) the applicant is not the true owner of the driver training school.
§ 709. SUSPENSION AND REVOCATION
(a) The Commissioner may at any time cancel, suspend, revoke, or refuse
to renew any driver’s training school or instructor’s license when he or she the
Commissioner is satisfied that:
* * *
(4) the licensee has willfully violated the provisions of section 705 of
this title; or
(5) the licensee has failed to comply with the rules of the Commissioner
made pursuant to this subchapter.
* * *
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 68 of 97
2025
Sec. 40. 23 V.S.A. § 751(e) is amended to read:
(e) A company shall require that a personal vehicle used to provide
prearranged rides comply with all applicable laws and regulations rules
concerning vehicle equipment.
Sec. 41. 23 V.S.A. § 941(a) is amended to read:
(a) No policy insuring against liability arising out of the ownership,
maintenance, or use of any motor vehicle may be delivered or issued for
delivery in this State with respect to any motor vehicle registered or principally
garaged in this State unless coverage is provided for the protection of persons
insured under the policy or a supplemental policy who are legally entitled to
recover damages, from owners or operators of uninsured, underinsured, or hit-
and-run motor vehicles, for bodily injury, sickness, or disease, including death,
and for property damages resulting from the ownership, maintenance, or use of
such uninsured, underinsured, or hit-and-run motor vehicle. The coverage for
property damages shall be sufficient to indemnify a claim for damages to
which the claimant is legally entitled of no more than $10,000.00 per claim,
subject to a $150.00 deductible; provided, however, to the extent that other
direct damage coverage is valid and collectible:
(1) this deductible shall not apply to a claimant who is otherwise insured
for direct damages to his or her motor vehicle, in which case:
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 69 of 97
2025
(A) the coverage for property damages provided in this section shall
be applied, without deductible, to pay the deductible of the other direct damage
coverage; and
(B) the balance of the direct damage claim, if any, shall be covered
by such other direct damages coverage to the extent of its limits; and
(2) further, any other claim for property damages, not direct damages, to
which the claimant is legally entitled, shall be paid by the coverage required by
this section, without deductible, to the extent of the limits provided in this
section.
Sec. 42. 23 V.S.A. chapter 13 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 13. OPERATION OF VEHICLES
* * *
§ 1001. RULES
(a) The Commissioner may adopt rules:
* * *
(3) relating to any other matter or thing that, in his or her the
Commissioner’s judgment, may hinder or impede the operator in the safe and
careful operation of a motor vehicle; and
(4) in explanation of and in addition to, but not inconsistent with, the
provisions of this title concerning any matter or thing that, in his or her the
Commissioner’s judgment, may render the operation of motor vehicles safer
and lessen motor vehicle crashes and resulting injuries or fatalities.
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 70 of 97
2025
* * *
§ 1007. LOCAL SPEED LIMITS
* * *
(d) The special regulations ordinances have the full force and effect of law
and are in the case of regulations ordinances adopted under subsections (a) and
(b) of this section subject to review by the Traffic Committee, whose decision
is final.
* * *
§ 1008. REGULATIONS ORDINANCES IN MUNICIPALITIES
(a) The legislative body of a municipality may make adopt special
regulations ordinances as to the operation, use, and parking of motor vehicles,
including angle parking; as to the location, design, and structure of traffic
lights; as to “stop” signs and “yield right of way” signs at intersections; as to
“no-passing” zones; and as to streets designated for one-way traffic in the
thickly settled portions of the municipality and may cause any street or
highway of adequate width to be divided by appropriate markings into three or
more lanes and may, by ordinance or regulation, regulate the direction of travel
and the turning of vehicles proceeding in those lanes and the passing of
vehicles in one lane by overtaking vehicles in another lane, may cause
markers, buttons, or signs to be placed within or adjacent to intersections and
thereby direct the course traveled by vehicles turning at an intersection, and
when markers, buttons, or signs are so placed no driver may turn a vehicle at
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 71 of 97
2025
an intersection other than as directed by the markers, buttons, or signs.
However, signs indicating the special regulations ordinances must be
conspicuously posted in and near all areas affected. Special regulations
Ordinances may not be established on any State highway as defined by 19
V.S.A. § 1(20). Regulations Ordinances on all State highways may be made
only by the Traffic Committee under section 1003 of this title, except that the
Traffic Committee may authorize the legislative body of a municipality to
regulate parking within a thickly settled area of a municipality, particularly
described in the authorization, on State highways. The board of school
directors of a union high school district may make adopt special regulations
ordinances as to the operation, use, and parking of motor vehicles within the
boundaries of its school property.
(b) The legislative body of a municipality may make adopt special
regulations ordinances as to the use of lights at night on motor vehicles at rest
or in motion on well lighted streets.
(c) Municipal motor vehicle regulations ordinances shall not duplicate or
contradict any provision of this title.
* * *
§ 1010. SPECIAL OCCASIONS; TOWN HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE
(a) When it appears that traffic will be congested by reason of a public
occasion or when a town highway is being reconstructed or maintained or
where utilities are being installed, relocated, or maintained, the legislative body
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 72 of 97
2025
of a municipality may make adopt special regulations ordinances as to the
speed of motor vehicles, may exclude motor vehicles from town highways, and
may make adopt such traffic rules and regulations ordinances as the public
good requires. However, signs indicating the special regulations ordinances
must be conspicuously posted in and near all affected areas, giving as much
notice as possible to the public so that alternative routes of travel could be
considered.
* * *
§ 1013. AUTHORITY OF ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS
Enforcement officers may make arrests for violation of this title; may direct,
control, and regulate traffic; and may make reasonable orders in enforcement
of this title or to prevent or alleviate traffic congestion, property damage, or
personal injury. No person may knowingly fail or refuse to comply with any
lawful order or direction of any enforcement officer.
* * *
§ 1015. AUTHORIZED EMERGENCY VEHICLES
(a) The driver of an authorized emergency vehicle, when responding to an
emergency call or when responding to, but not returning from, a fire alarm and
a law enforcement officer operating an authorized emergency vehicle in fresh
pursuit of a suspected violator of the law:
* * *
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 73 of 97
2025
(4) may exceed the maximum speed limits; and
(5) may disregard regulations ordinances governing direction of
movement or turning in specified directions.
* * *
§ 1076. COMMERCIAL MOTOR VEHICLES; RAILROAD CROSSINGS
* * *
(b) Operators of commercial and noncommercial vehicles shall:
* * *
(2) obey a traffic control device or the directions of an enforcement
official at the crossing; and
(3) not attempt to cross tracks if there is insufficient undercarriage
clearance.
* * *
§ 1102. REMOVAL OF STOPPED VEHICLES
(a) Subject to subsection (c) of this section, any enforcement officer is
authorized to:
* * *
(2) cause the removal of an unattended vehicle or cargo that is an
obstruction to traffic or to maintenance of the highway to a garage or other
place of safety; and
(3) cause the removal of any vehicle found upon a highway, as defined
in 19 V.S.A. § 1, to a garage or other place of safety when:
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 74 of 97
2025
* * *
§ 1104. STOPPING PROHIBITED
(a) Except when necessary to avoid conflict with other traffic, or in
compliance with law or the directions of an enforcement officer or official
traffic-control device, no person may:
* * *
(2) Stand or park a vehicle, whether occupied or not, except
momentarily to pick up or discharge a passenger:
* * *
(E) within 20 feet of the driveway entrance to any fire station and on
the side of a street opposite and within 75 feet of the entrance to any fire
station, when properly signposted; or
(F) at any place where official signs prohibit standing.
(3) Park a vehicle, whether occupied or not, except temporarily for the
purpose of and while actually engaged in loading or unloading merchandise or
a passenger:
(A) within 50 feet of the nearest rail of a railroad crossing;
(B) at any place where official signs prohibit parking; or
(C) at any place where official signs restrict parking at an electric
vehicle charging station and the vehicle violates the restrictions.
* * *
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 75 of 97
2025
§ 1105. ADDITIONAL PARKING REGULATIONS ORDINANCES
* * *
§ 1133. ELUDING A POLICE OFFICER
* * *
(b)(1) A person who violates subsection (a) of this section shall be
imprisoned for not more than one year or fined not more than $1,000.00, or
both.
* * *
(4)(A) In the event that death to any person other than the operator is
proximately caused by the operator’s knowing violation of subsection (a) of
this section, the operator shall be imprisoned for not less than one year nor
more than 15 years or fined not more than $10,000.00, or both.
(B) If death to more than one person other than the operator is
proximately caused by the operator’s knowing violation of subsection (a) of
this section, the operator may be convicted of a separate violation of this
subdivision (4) for each decedent.
* * *
§ 1134b. USING TOBACCO OR CANNABIS IN A MOTOR VEHICLE
WITH CHILD PRESENT
* * *
(c)(1) A person who violates subsection (a) of this section shall be subject
to a civil penalty of not more than $100.00 and no points shall be assessed.
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 76 of 97
2025
(2) A person who violates subsection (b) of this section commits a
misdemeanor crime and shall be subject to the following penalties:
(A) a fine of not more than $500.00 for a first offense;
(B) a fine of not more than $750.00 for a second offense; and
(C) a fine of not more than $1,000.00 for a third or subsequent
offense.
* * *
§ 1136. APPLICATION OF SUBCHAPTER; RIGHTS AND
OBLIGATIONS OF BICYCLISTS UNDER OTHER LAWS
* * *
(d)(1) Except as provided in this subsection, motor-assisted bicycles shall
be governed as bicycles under Vermont law, and operators of motor-assisted
bicycles shall be subject to all of the rights and duties applicable to bicyclists
under Vermont law. Motor-assisted bicycles and their operators shall be
exempt from motor vehicle registration and inspection and operator’s license
requirements. A person shall not operate a motor-assisted bicycle on a
sidewalk in Vermont.
* * *
(3) Nothing in this subsection shall interfere with the right of
municipalities to regulate the operation and use of motor-assisted bicycles
pursuant to 24 V.S.A. § 2291(1) and (4), as long as the regulations ordinances
do not conflict with this subsection.
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 77 of 97
2025
* * *
§ 1213a. IMMOBILIZATION OF VEHICLE
* * *
(f) Costs. All costs of towing and impoundment shall be paid by the
defendant before the vehicle is released to its owner. If the defendant fails to
pay the towing and impoundment costs within 30 days after the immobilization
order expires, the State is authorized to sell the vehicle by public auction
pursuant to the procedures in 27 V.S.A. chapter 13 section 1213c of this
subchapter. The proceeds from the sale of the vehicle shall be used first to
offset the costs of towing, impounding, and releasing the vehicle. Any balance
remaining, after any liens on the vehicle have been paid in full, shall be paid to
the owner of the vehicle.
* * *
§ 1231. ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTIES
* * *
(d) The alleged violator shall be given notice and opportunity for a hearing.
Service of the notice shall be sufficient if sent by first-class mail to the
station’s address or the most recent address provided by the mechanic. The
notice shall include the following:
(1) a factual description of the alleged violation;
(2) a reference to the particular statute allegedly violated;
(3) the amount of the proposed administrative penalty; and
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 78 of 97
2025
(4) a warning that the person will be deemed to have waived his or her
the person’s right to a hearing, that the penalty will be imposed if no hearing is
requested within 15 days from date of notice, and that failure to pay a penalty
may result in suspension of his or her the person’s license.
* * *
§ 1243. LIGHTS
* * *
(c) Local regulations ordinances made and promulgated adopted by the
legislative bodies of municipalities govern within their respective
municipalities with relation to the use of lights at night on motor vehicles at
rest or in motion on well-lighted streets. Stop lights, turn signals, and other
signaling devices shall be lighted as prescribed for their use.
* * *
§ 1307. BRAKE EQUIPMENT REQUIRED
* * *
(d) Trucks and truck-tractors having three or more axles:
* * *
(2) manufactured between July 24, 1980 and October 27, 1986, if any
brake components have been removed, must be retrofitted to replace any brake
components so that the vehicle meets the requirements of subsection (a) of this
section, within one year of May 16, 1990; and
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 79 of 97
2025
(3) manufactured with at least two steerable axles, shall have brakes on
at least one steerable axle, except that any such vehicle manufactured after July
1, 1992 shall be equipped with brakes on all wheels.
* * *
§ 1391a. PENALTIES FOR OVERWEIGHT OPERATION
* * *
(b)(1) For violation of each of the statutory sections listed in subsection (a)
of this section, civil penalties shall be imposed as follows:
$15.00 for each 1,000 lbs. or portion thereof overweight for the first
5,000 lbs. overweight;
$30.00 for each 1,000 lbs. or portion thereof overweight when the
gross overweight is more than 5,000 lbs. and less than 10,001 lbs.;
$45.00 for each 1,000 lbs. or portion thereof overweight when the
gross overweight is more than 10,000 lbs. and less than 15,001 lbs.;
$60.00 for each 1,000 lbs. or portion thereof overweight when the
gross overweight is more than 15,000 lbs. and less than 20,001 lbs.;
$90.00 for each 1,000 lbs. or portion thereof overweight when the
gross overweight is more than 20,000 lbs. and less than 25,001 lbs.; and
$150.00 for each 1,000 lbs. or portion thereof overweight when the
gross overweight is more than 25,000 lbs.
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 80 of 97
2025
(2) Civil penalties for subsequent violations of subchapter 15, article 1
of this chapter shall be computed in accordance with subdivision (b)(1) of this
section with the following percentage increases:
(A) upon a second conviction of a violation occurring within one
year, five percent;
(B) upon a third conviction of a violation occurring within one year,
ten percent; and
(C) upon a fourth or subsequent conviction occurring within one
year, 15 percent.
* * *
§ 1396. SPECIAL WEIGHT LIMITS FOR BRIDGES AND HIGHWAYS
* * *
(b) In making the determination as to whether a reasonable alternative route
is available, the Secretary of Transportation shall, at a minimum, consider the
following factors:
* * *
(3) the length of the alternative route and any increase in time made
necessary by use of the alternative route; and
(4) whether an adverse effect has been created relative to the quiet
enjoyment and property values of persons living along the alternative route.
* * *
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 81 of 97
2025
§ 1400a. SPECIAL LOCAL HIGHWAY AND BRIDGE LIMITS;
REIMBURSEMENT FOR DAMAGES; SPECIAL PERMITS
* * *
(c)(1) The selectboard, trustees, or the mayor are authorized to accept for
the municipality compensation commensurate with the extra wear or
maintenance required on the highway traveled over or on any bridge by reason
of the overweight allowed by any permit approved by them or any exemption
provided under section 1400d of this title, which shall be used for the
maintenance of highways and bridges within the town, village, or city. The
following factors, at a minimum, shall be taken into consideration when
determining the amount of compensation due:
* * *
(C) the number and length of trips the vehicle will be making; and
(D) the condition of the highway before and after use by the vehicle
and costs associated with any needed repair.
* * *
§ 1401. CONTENTS OF PERMIT
(a) The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall incorporate in the permit
such descriptive matter as to the highways to be traveled over; his or her the
Commissioner’s restrictions as to width and character of the wheels of such
tractor, trailer, motor truck, or other motor vehicle; and such other regulations
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 82 of 97
2025
rules as in his or her the Commissioner’s judgment seem most conducive to a
proper use of the highways.
* * *
Sec. 43. 23 V.S.A. § 3101 is amended to read:
§ 3101. DEFINITIONS; SCOPE
* * *
(b) As used in this subchapter:,
(1) “Gasoline gasoline or other motor fuel” or “motor fuel” includes
aviation gasoline and shall not include the following:
(A)(1) kerosene;
(B)(2) clear or undyed diesel “fuel” as defined in section 3002 of this
title;
(C)(3) “railroad fuel” as defined in section 3002 of this title;
(D)(4) aircraft jet fuel; or
(E)(5) natural gas in any form.
* * *
Sec. 44. 23 V.S.A. chapter 29 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 29. SNOWMOBILES, VESSELS, AND WATER SPORTS
* * *
§ 3206. SNOWMOBILE OPERATION
* * *
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 83 of 97
2025
(b) A snowmobile shall not be operated:
(1) Across or on a plowed public highway unless:
(A) the The crossing is made at an angle of approximately 90 degrees
to the direction of the highway and at a place where no obstruction prevents a
quick and safe crossing;.
(B) the The operator brings the snowmobile to a complete stop before
entering the traveled portion of the highway;.
(C) the The operator yields the right of way to motor vehicles and
pedestrians using the highway; and.
(D) the The operator is 16 years of age or older. If the operator is
under 16 years of age but at least 12 years of age, that operator must be under
the direct supervision of a person 18 years of age or older.
* * *
(8) By a person born after July 1, 1983, on private or public land and
water without first obtaining a certificate of snowmobile education, unless he
or she the person is operating on land owned, leased, or farmed by his or her
the person’s parents, family, or guardian or the operator is the land owner.
(A) A person who is required to have a certificate of snowmobile
education shall do all of the following:
(i) possess Possess the certificate or a copy of the certificate when
operating a snowmobile on public or private lands and waters of the State; and.
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 84 of 97
2025
(ii) show Show the certificate or a copy of the certificate on
demand of an enforcement officer wearing an insignia identifying him or her
as a law enforcement officer. No person charged with violating this
subdivision shall be convicted if the person produces in court, to the officer, or
to a State’s Attorney, a certificate or a copy of the certificate that was valid at
the time the violation occurred. A person may show an electronic copy of the
certificate using a portable electronic device; however, use of a device for this
purpose does not in itself constitute consent for an enforcement officer to
access other contents of the device.
(B) The following persons are exempt from the requirements of this
subdivision:
(i) a person is operating on land owned by his or her parents,
family, or guardian or the operator is the landowner;
(ii) any other person exempted by rules of the Department of
Public Safety;
(iii) any person who is under the direct supervision of a certified
snowmobile safety instructor; and
(iv) a child not yet 12 years of age, but not younger than eight
when under the direct supervision of a parent or legal guardian who shall be
liable for the actions of the child.
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 85 of 97
2025
(C) The Department of Public Safety shall adopt rules that:
(i) That establish Establish criteria for a course of instruction in
snowmobile safety education.
(ii) Relating Relate to transient snowmobilers.
(iii) To administer Administer a verbal test when appropriate.
(iv) To coordinate Coordinate a statewide program of snowmobile
safety instruction and certification and ensure that a course of safety education
is available within each county.
(v) That Ensures a course of snowmobile safety education is
available at the age of eight. Any child eight years of age but not yet 12 who
passes the course may operate a snowmobile only when under the direct
supervision of a parent or legal guardian who shall be liable for the actions of
the child.
(D) Any course of snowmobile safety education that is offered shall
provide a minimum of six hours of instruction.
(E) Any State-certified instructor may offer a course of instruction in
snowmobile safety education approved by the Department of Public Safety.
(F) The Department of Public Safety or its designee shall issue a
certificate of snowmobile safety education to a person who:
(i) passes a departmentally prescribed course of snowmobile
safety education; or
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 86 of 97
2025
(ii) passes a snowmobile safety equivalency examination
administered by persons authorized to offer a course of snowmobile safety
education.
(G) Upon request, the Department of Public Safety shall provide,
without charge, snowmobile safety education materials to persons who plan to
take the snowmobile safety equivalency examination.
* * *
§ 3207a. SNOWMOBILING UNDER THE INFLUENCE OF ALCOHOL OR
DRUGS
(a) A person shall not operate, attempt to operate, or be in actual physical
control of a snowmobile on any lands, waters, or public highways of this State:
(1) when the person’s alcohol concentration is 0.08 or more; or
(2) when the person is under the influence of alcohol; or
(3) when the person is under the influence of any other drug or under the
combined influence of alcohol and any other drug to a degree that renders the
person incapable of safely operating a snowmobile.
* * *
§ 3317. PENALTIES
* * *
(g) Defective, stolen, or fraudulently registered motorboat; registration
revocation or suspension. The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles or his or her
the Commissioner’s authorized agent may suspend or revoke the registration of
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 87 of 97
2025
any motorboat registered in this State and repossess the number and certificate
to it, when he or she the Commissioner is satisfied that:
(1) a motorboat has been stolen and that the registrant has does not have
legal title; or
(2) a motorboat is in such poor mechanical or structural condition as to
make it unseaworthy; or
(3) a motorboat is operated without proper equipment after the owner
has been notified to procure and use such equipment as is required by law or
Department rules; or
(4) the owner of a motorboat has perpetrated some fraud upon the
Department of Motor Vehicles.
* * *
Sec. 45. 23 V.S.A. § 3514 is amended to read:
§ 3514. ADMINISTRATION OF CHAPTER; RULES
The Commissioner shall administer this chapter and shall adopt rules, and
prescribe forms and procedures for application and registration, consistent with
this chapter as necessary to carry its provisions into effect.
* * *
Sec. 46. 23 V.S.A. chapter 39 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 39. COMMERCIAL DRIVER’S LICENSE ACT
* * *
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 88 of 97
2025
§ 4110. APPLICATION FOR COMMERCIAL DRIVER’S LICENSE OR
COMMERCIAL LEARNER’S PERMIT
(a) The application for a commercial driver’s license or commercial
learner’s permit shall include the following:
* * *
(8) The proper fee.
(A) The four-year fee for a commercial driver’s license shall be
$108.00. The two-year fee shall be $72.00. In those instances where the
applicant surrenders a valid Vermont Class D license, the total fees due shall
be reduced by:
(i) one-quarter of the four-year fee established by section 601 of
this title for each remaining full year of validity; or
(ii) one-half of the two-year fee paid for each remaining full year
of validity.
(B) The fee for a commercial learner’s permit is $18.00.
* * *
§ 4111. COMMERCIAL DRIVER’S LICENSE
* * *
(d) Notification. Within 10 days after issuing a commercial driver’s
license, the Commissioner shall notify the Commercial Driver’s License
Information System of that fact, providing all information required to ensure
identification of the individual.
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 89 of 97
2025
(e) Expiration. The commercial driver’s license shall expire in the same
manner as set by section 601 of this title.
(f) Renewal. When applying for renewal of a commercial driver’s license,
the applicant shall complete the application form required by section 4110 of
this title, providing updated information and required certifications. If the
applicant wishes to retain a hazardous materials endorsement, the written test
for a hazardous materials endorsement must be taken and passed. In addition,
the applicant must successfully complete the security threat assessment
required by 49 C.F.R. Part 1572. Within 15 days after an adverse initial or
final determination of threat assessment being served by the U.S.
Transportation Security Administration, the applicant’s hazardous materials
endorsement shall be revoked or denied.
* * *
§ 4121. APPLICANTS FOR SCHOOL BUS ENDORSEMENTS
(a) An applicant for a school bus endorsement shall satisfy the following
requirements:
* * *
(2) Have knowledge covering the following topics, at minimum:
* * *
(C) State and federal laws, rules, and regulations related to traversing
safely highway rail grade crossings.
* * *
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 90 of 97
2025
* * * Title 24 * * *
Sec. 47. 24 V.S.A. § 2793b(b) is amended to read:
(b) At the first meeting of the State Board held after 45 days of receipt of a
completed application, the State Board shall designate a new town center
development district if the State Board finds, with respect to that district, the
municipality has:
* * *
(2) Provided a community investment agreement that has been executed
by authorized representatives of the municipal government, businesses and
property owners within the district, and community groups with an articulated
purpose of supporting downtown interests, and contains the following:
(A) A map of the designated new town center. The total area of land
encompassed within a designated new town center shall not exceed 125 acres.
In a municipality with a population greater than 15,000, the total area of land
encompassed within a designated new town center may include land in excess
of 125 acres provided that the additional area is needed to facilitate the
redevelopment of predominately predominantly developed land in accordance
with the smart growth principles defined under subdivision 2791(13) of this
title and shall not exceed 175 acres.
* * *
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 91 of 97
2025
Sec. 48. 24 V.S.A. § 5084(c) is amended to read:
(c) The Advisory Council shall meet no less not fewer than four times
during each State fiscal year, excluding subcommittee meetings. The
legislative members of the Council shall be entitled to compensation and
expenses as provided in 2 V.S.A. § 406 23. Members who are not State
employees shall receive reimbursement of expenses and a per diem as provided
in 32 V.S.A. § 1010.
* * * Title 28 * * *
Sec. 49. 28 V.S.A. § 760(e) is amended to read:
(e) Any compensation which is fixed in accordance with the rules and
regulations promulgated adopted by the Ccommissioner Commissioner may be
paid either in periodic installments or in lump sum. The compensation may be
drawn from the revolving fund established by section 752 of this title, from
any general fund maintained by the Department, or from any approved source.
Sec. 50. 28 V.S.A. § 801(g) is amended to read:
(g) Prescription medication; reentry planning.
(1) If an offender takes a prescribed medication while incarcerated and
that prescribed medication continues to be both available at the facility and
clinically appropriate for the offender at the time of discharge from the
correctional facility, the Department or its contractor shall provide the
offender, at the time of release, with not less than a 28-day supply of the
prescribed medication, if possible, to ensure that the inmate offender may
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 92 of 97
2025
continue taking the medication as prescribed until the offender is able to fill a
new prescription for the medication in the community. The Department or its
contractor shall also provide the offender exiting the facility with a valid
prescription to continue the medication after any supply provided during
release from the facility is depleted.
* * *
* * * Title 32 * * *
Sec. 51. 32 V.S.A. § 182(a) is amended to read:
(a) In addition to the duties expressly set forth elsewhere by law, the
Commissioner of Finance and Management shall:
* * *
(8) Prepare monthly revenue reports for the Governor, Secretary of
Administration, and other officials and for release to the general public, and a
comprehensive annual financial report Annual Comprehensive Financial
Report (ACFR) in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles
that shall be distributed to the Chairs of the House Committees on
Appropriations, on Corrections and Institutions, and on Ways and Means and
to the Senate Committees on Appropriations, on Finance, and on Institutions
on or before December 31 of each year. The provisions of 2 V.S.A. § 20(d)
(expiration of required reports) shall not apply to the required report to be
made under this subdivision.
* * *
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 93 of 97
2025
Sec. 52. 32 V.S.A. § 306(a) is amended to read:
(a) The Governor shall submit to the General Assembly, not later than the
third Tuesday of every annual session, a budget that shall embody the
Governor’s estimates, requests, and recommendations for appropriations or
other authorizations for expenditures from the State Treasury. In the first year
of the biennium, the budget shall relate to the two succeeding fiscal years. In
the second year of the biennium, it shall relate to the succeeding fiscal year.
The budget shall be based upon the official State revenue estimates, including
the Medicaid estimated caseloads and per-member per-month expenditures,
adopted by the Emergency Board pursuant to section 305a of this title.
(1) As part of the budget report, the Governor shall:
* * *
(C) itemize current services liabilities, including the total obligations
and the amount estimated for full funding in the current year in which an
amortization schedule exists. These shall include the following liabilities
projected for the start of the budget fiscal year:
* * *
(v) projected fund liabilities of the funds identified in the “Notes”
section of the most recent Comprehensive Annual Financial Report (CAFR)
Annual Comprehensive Financial Report (ACFR), including the Workers’
Compensation Fund, the State Liability Insurance Fund, the Medical Insurance
Fund, and the Dental Insurance Fund; and
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 94 of 97
2025
* * *
Sec. 53. 32 V.S.A. § 308b(c) is amended to read:
(c) The Human Services Caseload Reserve shall contain two sub-accounts:
(1) A sub-account for incurred but not reported Medicaid expenses.
Each year beginning with fiscal year 2020, the Department of Finance and
Management shall adjust the amount reserved for incurred but not reported
Medicaid expenses to equal the amount specified in the Comprehensive
Annual Financial Report Annual Comprehensive Financial Report (ACFR) for
the fiscal year occurring two years prior for the estimated amount of incurred
but not reported Medicaid expenses associated with the current Medicaid
Global Commitment waiver.
* * *
Sec. 54. 32 V.S.A. § 605(a) is amended to read:
(a) The Governor shall, not later than the third Tuesday of every annual
legislative session, submit a consolidated Executive Branch fee report and
request to the General Assembly, which shall accompany the Governor’s
annual budget report and request submitted to the General Assembly as
required by section 306 of this title, except that the first fee report shall be
submitted by October 1, 1996 to the House Committee on Ways and Means,
the Senate Committee on Finance, and the House and Senate Committees on
Government Operations. The first fee request shall be submitted during the
1997 session as provided under this section. The content of each annual report
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 95 of 97
2025
and request for fees concerning State agency public records maintained
pursuant to 1 V.S.A. chapter 5, subchapter 3 shall be prepared by the Secretary
of State, who shall base all recommended fee amounts on “actual cost.” The
provisions of 2 V.S.A. § 20(d) (expiration of required reports) shall not apply
to the report to be made under this section.
Sec. 55. 32 V.S.A. § 711 is amended to read:
§ 711. APPROVAL OF DEBT
If a person as defined in 1 V.S.A. § 128, except a municipality as defined in
1 V.S.A. § 126, pays a majority of its operating expenses, as determined in
accordance with Generally Accepted Accounting Principles, in any fiscal year
with amounts appropriated by the State, either directly or indirectly as a pass-
through from a State agency or department, and the person intends to incur any
debt in that fiscal year in the cumulative principal amount greater than
$1,000,000.00, including debt incurred through the issuance of bonds, notes,
bank loans, mortgages, lease-purchase contracts, and capital leases, then the
person shall notify and obtain the approval of the State Treasurer and the
Governor prior to incurring the debt. For the purposes of this section, amounts
appropriated by the State shall not include nondiscretionary federal funds
known as special revenue funds as presented in the State’s comprehensive
annual financial report Annual Comprehensive Financial Report (ACFR).
* * * Conforming revisions; Interpretation; Effective Dates * * *
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 96 of 97
2025
Sec. 56. CONFORMING REVISIONS FOR HOUSE COMMITTEE
CHANGES
When preparing the cumulative supplements and replacement volumes of
the Vermont Statutes Annotated for publication, the Office of Legislative
Counsel shall make the following revisions to these supplements and volumes
for consistency with House Rule 25, as long as the revisions have no other
effect on the meaning of the affected statutes:
(1) replace “House Committee on Environment and Energy” with
“House Committee on Environment” or “House Committee on Energy and
Digital Infrastructure,” as applicable; and
(2) replace “House Committee on Government Operations and Military
Affairs,” with “House Committee on Energy and Digital Infrastructure” for
matters involving information technology and cybersecurity.
Sec. 57. INTERPRETATION
It is the intent of the General Assembly that the technical amendments in
this act shall not supersede substantive changes contained in other bills enacted
by the General Assembly during the current biennium. Where possible, the
amendments in this act shall be interpreted to be supplemental to other
amendments to the same sections of statute; to the extent the provisions
conflict, the substantive changes in other acts shall take precedence over the
technical changes in this act.
VT LEG #383717 v.1

No. 18 Page 97 of 97
2025
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 58. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
Date Governor signed bill: May 13, 2025
VT LEG #383717 v.1